Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3858
(UTC 702) Trustee's bond.

(UTC 702) (a) A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee's duties only if the court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not dispensed with the requirement.

(b) The court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. The court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

(c) A bank or trust company qualified to act as a trustee in this state need not give bond, even if required by the terms of the trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 58.